Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.380

Quality management, accountability, and performance system—Definitions.

As used in RCW 43.17.385 and 43.17.390:

(1) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department, office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or institution of higher education, and all offices of executive branch state government-elected officials, except agricultural commissions under Title 15 RCW.

(2) "Quality management, accountability, and performance system" means a nationally recognized integrated, interdisciplinary system of measures, tools, and reports used to improve the performance of a work unit or organization.

[ 2005 c 384 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2005 c 384: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of public programs and activities. Public programs must continuously improve accountability and performance reporting in order to increase public trust.

(2) Washington state government agencies must continuously improve their management and performance so citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars.

(3) The application of best practices in performance management has improved results and accountability in many Washington state agencies and other jurisdictions.

(4) All Washington state agencies must develop a performance-based culture that can better demonstrate accountability and achievement." [ 2005 c 384 s 1.]